Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Administration

§ 2091.
Director of the Office of Professional Regulation; duties.

The Director of the Office of Professional Regulation, with the advice of the advisors appointed under this chapter, shall:

provide general information to applicants for admission to licensure as physical therapists or physical therapist assistants;

explain appeal procedures to licensees and applicants and complaint procedures to the public;

explain sanctions, including license revocation and suspension, which may be imposed in disciplinary cases, the criteria by which sanctions are selected, and procedures for reinstatement where appropriate;

administer fees as previously established by law;

receive and evaluate applications for licensure, provide for examinations and set passing scores, provide licenses to applicants qualified under this chapter, renew, revoke, and reinstate licenses, or otherwise discipline licensees as ordered by an administrative law officer;

issue to each person licensed a certificate of licensure that shall be prima facie evidence of the right of the person to whom it is issued to practice as a licensed physical therapist or to represent himself or herself as a licensed physical therapist assistant, subject to the conditions and limitations of this chapter; and

adopt rules necessary to perform his or her duties under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(d);

1997, No. 40

, § 49(a);

2005, No. 27

, § 57.

§ 2092.
Advisor appointees.

The Secretary of State shall appoint two physical therapists to serve as advisors in matters relating to physical therapy. They shall be appointed for staggered five-year terms and shall serve at the pleasure of the Secretary. One of the initial appointments may be for less than a full term. Appointees shall have not less than three years’ experience as a physical therapist immediately preceding appointment and shall be actively engaged in the practice of physical therapy in Vermont during incumbency.

The Director shall refer complaints and disciplinary matters to an administrative law officer established under

3 V.S.A. § 129(j)

.

The Director shall seek the advice of the physical therapists appointed under this section in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 54;

1997, No. 40

, § 49(a);

2005, No. 27

, § 58.